Idaho, session 2025, S1191.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of Energy and Mineral Resources
the following amounts to be expended according to the designated expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $164,000 $317,000 $481,000
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 37,000 37,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 11,300 0 11,300
TOTAL $212,300 $317,000 $529,300
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Office of Energy and Mineral Resources is
hereby reduced by the following amounts from the listed funds for personnel
costs for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
Renewable Energy Resources Fund $30,400
Petroleum Price Violation Fund 17,900
TOTAL $48,300


SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Office of Energy and Mineral Resources is hereby increased by one
(1.00) for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. SPEED COUNCIL REPORTING. Of the moneys appropriated in
Section 1 of this act from the General Fund for the Strategic Permitting,
Efficiency, and Economic Development Council (SPEED), the Office of Energy
and Mineral Resources shall provide a report to the Joint Finance-Appropri-
ations Committee no later than December 1, 2025. The report shall provide
a summary on the use of these moneys, measurable actions and findings,
an overview of planned, completed, and ongoing projects supported by the
Council, and justification for continued ongoing funding. Prior to final
submission, the format of the report shall be approved by the Budget and Pol-
icy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 5. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.